test/src/gt-desc-yamls/tests_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - гар: # Masculine vowel, Cns final
    гар+N+Sg+Nom: гар
    гар+N+Sg+Acc: гарые
    гар+N+Sg+Gen: гарай
    гар+N+Sg+Dat: гарта
    гар+N+Sg+Ins: гараар
    гар+N+Sg+Com: гартай
    гар+N+Sg+Abl: гарһаа
    гар+N+Pl+Nom: гарнууд
    гар+N+Pl+Acc: гарнуудые
    гар+N+Pl+Gen: гарнуудай
    гар+N+Pl+Dat: гарнуудта
    гар+N+Pl+Ins: гарнуудаар
    гар+N+Pl+Com: гарнуудтай
    гар+N+Pl+Abl: гарнуудһаа

  Noun - бэшэг: # Feminine vowel, Cns final
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Nom: бэшэг
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Acc: бэшэгые
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Gen: бэшэгэй
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Dat: бэшэгтэ
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Ins: бэшэгээр
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Com: бэшэгтэй
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Abl: бэшэгһээ
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Nom: бэшэгүүд
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Acc: бэшэгүүдые
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Gen: бэшэгүүдэй
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Dat: бэшэгүүдтэ
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Ins: бэшэгүүдээр
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Com: бэшэгүүдтэй
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Abl: бэшэгүүдһээ

  Noun - морин: # Neuter vowel, Cns final
    морин+N+Sg+Nom: морин
    морин+N+Sg+Acc: мориие
    морин+N+Sg+Gen: мориной
    морин+N+Sg+Dat: мориндо
    морин+N+Sg+Ins: морёор
    морин+N+Sg+Com: моринтой
    морин+N+Sg+Abl: моринһоо
    морин+N+Pl+Nom: морид
    морин+N+Pl+Acc: моридые
    морин+N+Pl+Gen: моридой
    морин+N+Pl+Dat: моридто
    морин+N+Pl+Ins: моридоор
    морин+N+Pl+Com: моридтой
    морин+N+Pl+Abl: моридһоо

  Noun - шшшор: # Low round vowel, Cns final
    шшшор+N+Sg+Nom: шшшор
    шшшор+N+Sg+Acc: шшшоре
    шшшор+N+Sg+Gen: шшшорэй
    шшшор+N+Sg+Dat: шшшорда
    шшшор+N+Sg+Ins: шшшораар
    шшшор+N+Sg+Com: шшшортай
    шшшор+N+Sg+Abl: шшшорһаа
    шшшор+N+Pl+Nom: шшшорууд
    шшшор+N+Pl+Acc: шшшорууде
    шшшор+N+Pl+Gen: шшшоруудай
    шшшор+N+Pl+Dat: шшшоруудда
    шшшор+N+Pl+Ins: шшшоруудаар
    шшшор+N+Pl+Com: шшшоруудтай
    шшшор+N+Pl+Abl: шшшоруудһаа

  Noun - Москва: # Invisible long vowel
    Москва+N+Sg+Nom: Москва
    Москва+N+Sg+Acc: Москвае
    Москва+N+Sg+Gen: Москвагай
    Москва+N+Sg+Dat: Москвада
    Москва+N+Sg+Ins: Москвагаар
    Москва+N+Sg+Com: Москватай
    Москва+N+Sg+Abl: Москваһаа

  Noun - : # Feminine vowel, long final final
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Nom: шэрээ
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Acc: шэрээе
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Gen: шэрээгэй
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Dat: шэрээдэ
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Ins: шэрээгээр
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Com: шэрээтэй
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Abl: шэрээһээ
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Nom: шэрээнүүд
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Acc: шэрээнүүдые
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Gen: шэрээнүүдэй
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Dat: шэрээнүүдтэ
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Ins: шэрээнүүдээр
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Com: шэрээнүүдтэй
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Abl: шэрээнүүдһээ

  Noun - бороо: # Low round vowel, long final vowel
    бороо+N+Sg+Nom: бороо
    бороо+N+Sg+Acc: бороое
    бороо+N+Sg+Gen: бороогой
    бороо+N+Sg+Dat: бороодо
    бороо+N+Sg+Ins: бороогоор
    бороо+N+Sg+Com: бороотой
    бороо+N+Sg+Abl: борооһоо
    бороо+N+Pl+Nom: бороонууд
    бороо+N+Pl+Acc: бороонуудые
    бороо+N+Pl+Gen: бороонуудай
    бороо+N+Pl+Dat: бороонуудта
    бороо+N+Pl+Ins: бороонуудаар
    бороо+N+Pl+Com: бороонуудтай
    бороо+N+Pl+Abl: бороонуудһаа

  Noun - малгай: # Masculine vowel, final й
    малгай+N+Sg+Nom: малгай
    малгай+N+Sg+Acc: малгайе
    малгай+N+Sg+Gen: малгайн
    малгай+N+Sg+Dat: малгайда
    малгай+N+Sg+Ins: малгайгаар
    малгай+N+Sg+Com: малгайтай
    малгай+N+Sg+Abl: малгайһаа
    малгай+N+Pl+Nom: малгайнууд
    малгай+N+Pl+Acc: малгайнуудые
    малгай+N+Pl+Gen: малгайнуудай
    малгай+N+Pl+Dat: малгайнуудта
    малгай+N+Pl+Ins: малгайнуудаар
    малгай+N+Pl+Com: малгайнуудтай
    малгай+N+Pl+Abl: малгайнуудһаа

  Noun - нохой: # Low round vowel, final й
    нохой+N+Sg+Nom: нохой
    нохой+N+Sg+Acc: нохойе
    нохой+N+Sg+Gen: нохойн
    нохой+N+Sg+Dat: нохойдо
    нохой+N+Sg+Ins: нохойгоорр
    нохой+N+Sg+Com: нохойтой
    нохой+N+Sg+Abl: нохойһоо
    нохой+N+Pl+Nom: нохойнууд
    нохой+N+Pl+Acc: нохойнуудые
    нохой+N+Pl+Gen: нохойнуудай
    нохой+N+Pl+Dat: нохойнуудта
    нохой+N+Pl+Ins: нохойнуудаар
    нохой+N+Pl+Com: нохойнуудтай
    нохой+N+Pl+Abl: нохойнуудһаа

  Noun - Бээлэй: # Feminine vowel, final й
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Nom: бээлэй
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Acc: бээлэйе
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Gen: бээлэйн
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Dat: бээлэйдэ
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Ins: бээлэйгээр
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Com: бээлэйтэй
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Abl: бээлэйһээ
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Nom: бээлэйнүүд
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Acc: бээлэйнүүдые
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Gen: бээлэйнүүдэй
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Dat: бээлэйнүүдтэ
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Ins: бээлэйнүүдээр
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Com: бээлэйнүүдтэй
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Abl: бээлэйнүүдһээ

  Noun - толи: # Final и
    толи+N+Sg+Nom: толи
    толи+N+Sg+Acc: толиие
    толи+N+Sg+Gen: толиин
    толи+N+Sg+Dat: толидо
    толи+N+Sg+Ins: толёор
    толи+N+Sg+Com: толитой
    толи+N+Sg+Abl: толиһоо
    толи+N+Pl+Nom: толинууд
    толи+N+Pl+Acc: толинуудые
    толи+N+Pl+Gen: толинуудай
    толи+N+Pl+Dat: толинуудта
    толи+N+Pl+Ins: толинуудаар
    толи+N+Pl+Com: толинуудтай
    толи+N+Pl+Abl: толинуудһаа
